Louisiana, session 2026, SB436.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 47:306.6 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§306.6. Annual aviation fuel estimates; calculations; agreements with the
Department of Transportation and Development; reporting
requirements; designated ramp space for public use
A.(1) Annual estimates. The secretary of the Department of Revenue shall
annually estimate the revenue to be derived from state taxes collected from
purchases of aviation fuel. Monies collected from the avails of the taxes levied on
aviation fuel shall be appropriated to the Department of Transportation and
Development to be used solely for airport-related purposes; however, no portion of
such monies shall be disbursed to any airport that does not clearly indicate on its
property the designated ramp space for public use within its published airport
directory or diagram. The designated ramp space for public use at an airport
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 436 ENROLLED
shall be made available for transient aircraft without charge for no more than
two hours. Nothing in this Subsection shall be construed to require a fixed base
operator, airport operator, or tenant to provide fueling, ground handling,
towing, parking assistance, concierge services, or any other services to aircraft
utilizing the designated ramp space for public use.
(2)B. The calculation of "annual estimated revenue" shall be determined by
using all of the following:
(a)(1) Average price per gallon. The average price per gallon of aviation fuel
shall be determined through a two-year agreement between the secretary of the
Department of Revenue and the secretary of the Department of Transportation and
Development rules and procedures promulgated by the Department of
Transportation and Development, office of multimodal commerce. The average
price per gallon shall be based on historical data, current market fuel prices, and
trends provided by relevant reports, including reputable sources such as government
agencies, industry associations, or market analysis firms.
(b)(2) Gallons sold data source. The volume of aviation fuel sold in Louisiana
shall be determined based on data provided by the Energy Information
Administration or the Bureau of Transportation Statistics. In the event data from
either of these two organizations is unavailable, the secretary of the Department of
Revenue may utilize other reputable data sources, subject to approval by the Joint
Legislative Committee on the Budget through rules and procedures promulgated
by the Department of Transportation and Development, office of multimodal
commerce. When determining the volume of aviation fuel sold in Louisiana, the
office of multimodal commerce may utilize data published by federal
government agencies, including but not limited to the United States Energy
Information Administration and the Bureau of Transportation Statistics, as well
as other verifiable and publicly available data sources.
(3) State taxes collected from aviation fuel sales. The Department of
Revenue shall provide to the Department of Transportation and Development
an annual report of actual state tax collections derived from sales of aviation
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 436 ENROLLED
fuel. The Department of Transportation and Development, office of multimodal
commerce, shall consider the collection amounts reported in accordance with
this Paragraph when developing rules and procedures for calculating estimated
aviation fuel tax revenue.
(c)(4) Sales tax rate. The sales tax rate applied in calculating the annual
estimated revenue shall be based on the current state sales tax rate in effect at the
time of the estimate. If the state sales tax rate changes during the fiscal year, the
annual estimated revenue shall be recalculated using the new sales tax rate.
(3) The secretary of the Department of Revenue shall submit the annual
estimated revenue to be derived from state taxes collected from purchases of aviation
fuel to the Revenue Estimating Conference within five calendar days of the annual
estimate being completed by the secretary.
C. The Revenue Estimating Conference shall utilize this estimation
formula and the rules and policies promulgated by the Department of
Transportation and Development, office of multimodal commerce, to develop
its annual estimate of aviation fuel taxes collected.
B. Reporting requirements. The secretary of the Department of Revenue shall
submit an annual report to the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget no later
than March thirty-first of each year which contains the following information:
(1) The average price per gallon used in the calculation.
(2) The total gallons of aviation fuel sold in the state used in the calculation,
as reported by the Energy Information Administration or the Bureau of
Transportation Statistics.
(3) The sales tax rate applied in the calculation.
C. Legislative oversight. All agreements between the secretary of the
Department of Revenue and the secretary of the Department of Transportation and
Development required pursuant to the provisions of this Section related to the
calculation of the annual estimated revenue derived from sales of aviation fuel shall
be reviewed and approved by the Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget prior
to the agreement becoming binding between the parties.
Page 3 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 436 ENROLLED
D. The provisions of this Section shall be terminated and have no effect on
January 1, 2027.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 4 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.